waterfox/browser/locales/pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX K Y 259
SFX K   ir              o/PL                    uir
SFX K   r               o/PL                    air
SFX K   r               s/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              i/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ímos/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ís/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              em/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ía/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ías/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íamos/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íeis/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íam/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              í/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íste/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   r               u/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ímos/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ístes/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íram/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íra/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íras/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íramos/PL               [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íreis/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íram/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   0               ei/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   0               ás/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   0               á/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   0               emos/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   0               eis/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   0               ão/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              a/PL                    uir
SFX K   ir              as/PL                   uir
SFX K   ir              amos/PL                 uir
SFX K   ir              ais/PL                  uir
SFX K   ir              am/PL                   uir
SFX K   r               a/PL                    air
SFX K   r               as/PL                   air
SFX K   r               amos/PL                 air
SFX K   r               ais/PL                  air
SFX K   r               am/PL                   air
SFX K   ir              ísse/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ísses/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íssemos/PL              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ísseis/PL               [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íssem/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              íres/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   0               mos/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              írdes/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              írem/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   0               ia/PL                   [ua]ir
SFX K   0               ias/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   0               íamos/PL                [ua]ir
SFX K   0               íeis/PL                 [ua]ir
SFX K   0               iam/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              i/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   r               a/PL                    air
SFX K   ir              a/PL                    uir
SFX K   r               amos/PL                 air
SFX K   ir              amos/PL                 uir
SFX K   ir              í/PL                    [ua]ir
SFX K   r               am/PL                   air
SFX K   ir              am/PL                   uir
SFX K   r               ndo/PL                  [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ído/PL                  [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ída/PL                  [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ídos/PL                 [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ídas/PL                 [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ido/PL                  quir
SFX K   ir              ida/PL                  quir
SFX K   ir              idos/PL                 quir
SFX K   ir              idas/PL                 quir
SFX K   r               nho/PL                  por
SFX K   or              ões/PL                  por
SFX K   or              õe/PL                   por
SFX K   r               mos/PL                  por
SFX K   r               ndes/PL                 por
SFX K   or              õem/PL                  por
SFX K   or              unha/PL                 por
SFX K   or              unhas/PL                por
SFX K   or              únhamos/PL              por
SFX K   or              únheis/PL               por
SFX K   or              unham/PL                por
SFX K   or              us/PL                   por
SFX K   or              useste/PL               por
SFX K   or              ôs/PL                   por
SFX K   or              usemos/PL               por
SFX K   or              usestes/PL              por
SFX K   or              useram/PL               por
SFX K   or              usera/PL                por
SFX K   or              useras/PL               por
SFX K   or              uséramos/PL             por
SFX K   or              uséreis/PL              por
SFX K   or              useram/PL               por
SFX K   0               ei/PL                   por
SFX K   0               ás/PL                   por
SFX K   0               á/PL                    por
SFX K   0               emos/PL                 por
SFX K   0               eis/PL                  por
SFX K   0               ão/PL                   por
SFX K   r               nha/PL                  por
SFX K   r               nhas/PL                 por
SFX K   r               nhamos/PL               por
SFX K   r               nhais/PL                por
SFX K   r               nham/PL                 por
SFX K   or              usesse/PL               por
SFX K   or              usesses/PL              por
SFX K   or              uséssemos/PL            por
SFX K   or              usésseis/PL             por
SFX K   or              usessem/PL              por
SFX K   or              user/PL                 por
SFX K   or              useres/PL               por
SFX K   or              user/PL                 por
SFX K   or              usermos/PL              por
SFX K   or              userdes/PL              por
SFX K   or              userem/PL               por
SFX K   0               ia/PL                   por
SFX K   0               ias/PL                  por
SFX K   0               íamos/PL                por
SFX K   0               íeis/PL                 por
SFX K   0               iam/PL                  por
SFX K   or              õe/PL                   por
SFX K   r               nha/PL                  por
SFX K   r               nhamos/PL               por
SFX K   r               nde/PL                  por
SFX K   r               nham/PL                 por
SFX K   r               ndo/PL                  por
SFX K   r               sto/PL                  por
SFX K   r               sta/PL                  por
SFX K   r               stos/PL                 por
SFX K   r               stas/PL                 por
SFX K   0               es/PL                   por
SFX K   0               mos/PL                  por
SFX K   0               des/PL                  por
SFX K   0               em/PL                   por
SFX K   zer             ço/PL                   fazer
SFX K   r               s/PL                    fazer
SFX K   zer             z/PL                    fazer
SFX K   r               mos/PL                  fazer
SFX K   r               is/PL                   fazer
SFX K   r               m/PL                    fazer
SFX K   er              ia/PL                   fazer
SFX K   er              ias/PL                  fazer
SFX K   er              íamos/PL                fazer
SFX K   er              íeis/PL                 fazer
SFX K   er              iam/PL                  fazer
SFX K   azer            iz/PL                   fazer
SFX K   azer            izeste/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            ez/PL                   fazer
SFX K   azer            izemos/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            izestes/PL              fazer
